Illinois, session 104th, HB2492.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Abandoned Newborn Infant Protection Act is 5amended by changing Sections 10, 20, 22, 30, and 35 and by 6adding Section 16 as follows: 7    (325 ILCS 2/10)8    Sec. 10. Definitions. In this Act: 9    "Abandon" has the same meaning as in the Abused and 10Neglected Child Reporting Act. 11    "Abused child" has the same meaning as in the Abused and 12Neglected Child Reporting Act. 13    "Child welfare agency" means an Illinois licensed public 14or private agency that receives a child for the purpose of 15placing or arranging for the placement of the child in a foster 16or pre-adoptive family home or other facility for child care, 17apart from the custody of the child's parents. 18    "Department" or "DCFS" means the Illinois Department of 19Children and Family Services. 20    "Emergency medical facility" means a freestanding 21emergency center or trauma center, as defined in the Emergency 22Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act. 23    "Emergency medical professional" includes licensed   HB2492- 2 -LRB104 08116 KTG 18162 b1physicians, and any emergency medical technician, emergency 2medical technician-intermediate, advanced emergency medical 3technician, paramedic, trauma nurse specialist, and 4pre-hospital registered nurse, as defined in the Emergency 5Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act. 6    "Fire station" means a fire station within the State with 7at least one staff person. 8    "Hospital" has the same meaning as in the Hospital 9Licensing Act. 10    "Legal custody" means the relationship created by a court 11order in the best interest of a newborn infant that imposes on 12the infant's custodian the responsibility of physical 13possession of the infant, the duty to protect, train, and 14discipline the infant, and the duty to provide the infant with 15food, shelter, education, and medical care, except as these 16are limited by parental rights and responsibilities. 17    "Neglected child" has the same meaning as in the Abused 18and Neglected Child Reporting Act. 19    "Newborn infant" means a child who a licensed physician 20reasonably believes is 30 days old or less at the time the 21child is initially relinquished to a hospital, police station, 22fire station, or emergency medical facility, and who is not an 23abused or a neglected child. 24    "Newborn safety device" means a device or container to 25accept delivery of a newborn infant less than 31 days old that:26        (1) is voluntarily installed by a hospital emergency   HB2492- 3 -LRB104 08116 KTG 18162 b1    department, fire station, emergency medical facility, or 2    police station that has medical, fire, or police personnel 3    available 24-hours, 7-days a week to take possession of 4    any newborn infant who is voluntarily left in the newborn 5    safety device;6        (2) is physically located as part of a hospital 7    emergency department, fire station, emergency medical 8    facility, or police station;9        (3) is located in an area that is conspicuous and 10    visible to the employees of the hospital emergency 11    department, fire station, emergency medical facility, or 12    police station;13        (4) is accessible to a person transferring the newborn 14    infant in a manner that allows the newborn infant to be 15    placed anonymously inside the newborn safety device from 16    outside the hospital emergency department, fire station, 17    emergency medical facility, or police station;18        (5) is locked after a newborn infant is placed in it so 19    a person outside the hospital emergency department, fire 20    station, emergency medical facility, or police station 21    cannot access the child;22        (6) provides a controlled environment for the care and 23    protection of the newborn infant;24        (7) notifies a centralized location in the hospital 25    emergency department, fire station, emergency medical 26    facility, or police station within 30 seconds of the   HB2492- 4 -LRB104 08116 KTG 18162 b1    newborn infant being placed in the newborn safety device; 2    and3        (8) triggers a 9-1-1 call if staff at the hospital 4    emergency department, fire station, emergency medical 5    facility, or police station do not respond within a 6    reasonable amount of time after a newborn infant is placed 7    in the newborn safety device.8    "Parent" or "biological parent" or "birth parent" means a 9person who has established maternity or paternity of the 10newborn infant through genetic testing. 11    "Police station" means a municipal police station, a 12county sheriff's office, a campus police department located on 13any college or university owned or controlled by the State or 14any private college or private university that is not owned or 15controlled by the State when employees of the campus police 16department are present, or any of the district headquarters of 17the Illinois State Police. 18    "Relinquish" means to bring a newborn infant, who a 19licensed physician reasonably believes is 30 days old or less, 20to a hospital, police station, fire station, or emergency 21medical facility and to leave the infant with personnel of the 22facility, if the person leaving the infant does not express an 23intent to return for the infant or states that the person will 24not return for the infant. "Relinquish" also means to 25voluntarily leave a newborn infant in a newborn safety device. 26In the case of a person who gives birth to an infant in a   HB2492- 5 -LRB104 08116 KTG 18162 b1hospital, the person's act of leaving that newborn infant at 2the hospital (i) without expressing an intent to return for 3the infant or (ii) stating that the person will not return for 4the infant is not a "relinquishment" under this Act. 5    "Temporary protective custody" means the temporary 6placement of a newborn infant within a hospital or other 7medical facility out of the custody of the infant's parent. 8(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-501, eff. 1-1-24; 9103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 10    (325 ILCS 2/16 new)11    Sec. 16. Grant awards for the installation of newborn 12safety devices. As soon as practicable, the Department, in 13consultation with the county board of each county, shall 14identify hospital emergency departments, fire stations, 15emergency medical facilities, and police stations to install, 16maintain, and provide outreach regarding newborn safety 17devices. Each county having a population less than 500,000 18shall identify one hospital emergency department, fire 19station, emergency medical facility, or police station to 20install a newborn safety device. Each county having a 21population greater than 500,000 shall identify a total of 4 22hospital emergency departments, fire stations, emergency 23medical facilities, or police stations, or any combination of 24those facilities, to install a newborn safety device. The 25Department shall award grants to the designated facilities of   HB2492- 6 -LRB104 08116 KTG 18162 b1each county to pay for the installation of a newborn safety 2device and any other costs associated with maintaining proper 3operation of the device. A designated facility's acceptance of 4the grant award and any agreement to install and maintain a 5newborn safety device shall be strictly voluntary. Upon the 6receipt of grant funds, a designated facility shall install, 7as soon as practicable, a newborn safety device that meets all 8applicable safety and installation requirements.9    A hospital emergency department, fire station, or 10emergency medical facility that operates a newborn safety 11device must accept and provide all necessary emergency 12services and care to a relinquished newborn infant in 13accordance with this Act. A police station that operates a 14newborn safety device must accept a relinquished newborn 15infant in accordance with this Act. 16    A hospital emergency department, fire station, emergency 17medical facility, or police station that operates a newborn 18safety device in accordance with this Act is immune from civil 19liability for an act or omission relating to the operation of 20the newborn safety device unless the act or omission 21constitutes gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct. 22Nothing in this subsection limits liability for negligence for 23care and medical treatment.  24    (325 ILCS 2/22)25    Sec. 22. Signage. Every hospital, fire station, emergency   HB2492- 7 -LRB104 08116 KTG 18162 b1medical facility, and police station that is required to 2accept a relinquished newborn infant in accordance with this 3Act must post, either by physical or electronic means, a sign 4in a conspicuous place on the exterior of the building housing 5the facility informing persons that a newborn infant may be 6relinquished at the facility or, if applicable, left in a 7newborn safety device located at the facility in accordance 8with this Act. The Department shall prescribe specifications 9for the signs and for their placement that will ensure 10statewide uniformity.11(Source: P.A. 102-4, eff. 4-27-21; 103-501, eff. 1-1-24.) 12    (325 ILCS 2/30)13    Sec. 30. Anonymity of relinquishing person. If there is no 14evidence of abuse or neglect of a relinquished newborn infant, 15the relinquishing person has the right to remain anonymous and 16to leave the hospital, police station, fire station, or 17emergency medical facility at any time and not be pursued or 18followed. Except for a person who relinquishes a newborn 19infant by placing the infant in a newborn safety device, 20before Before the relinquishing person leaves the hospital, 21police station, fire station, or emergency medical facility, 22the hospital, police station, fire station, or emergency 23medical facility personnel shall (i) verbally inform the 24relinquishing person that by relinquishing the child 25anonymously, the relinquishing person will have to petition   HB2492- 8 -LRB104 08116 KTG 18162 b1the court if the relinquishing person desires to prevent the 2termination of parental rights and regain custody of the child 3and (ii) offer the relinquishing person the information packet 4described in Section 35 of this Act. However, nothing in this 5Act shall be construed as precluding the relinquishing person 6from providing the relinquishing person's identity or 7completing the application forms for the Illinois Adoption 8Registry and Medical Information Exchange and requesting that 9the hospital, police station, fire station, or emergency 10medical facility forward those forms to the Illinois Adoption 11Registry and Medical Information Exchange. 12(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 13    (325 ILCS 2/35)14    Sec. 35. Information for relinquishing person. 15    (a) Except when a newborn infant is left in a newborn 16safety device, the The hospital, police station, fire station, 17or emergency medical facility that receives a newborn infant 18relinquished in accordance with this Act shall offer to the 19relinquishing person information about the relinquishment 20process and, either in writing or by referring such person to a 21website or other electronic resource, such information shall 22state that the relinquishing person's acceptance of the 23information is completely voluntary. The information packet 24must include all of the following: 25        (1) (Blank).   HB2492- 9 -LRB104 08116 KTG 18162 b1        (2) Written notice of the following: 2            (A) No sooner than 60 days following the date of 3        the initial relinquishment of the infant to a 4        hospital, police station, fire station, or emergency 5        medical facility, the child welfare agency or the 6        Department will commence proceedings for the 7        termination of parental rights and placement of the 8        infant for adoption. 9            (B) Failure of a parent of the infant to contact 10        the Department and petition for the return of custody 11        of the infant before termination of parental rights 12        bars any future action asserting legal rights with 13        respect to the infant. 14        (3) A resource list of providers of counseling 15    services including grief counseling, pregnancy counseling, 16    and counseling regarding adoption and other available 17    options for placement of the infant. 18    Upon request of a parent, the Department of Public Health 19shall provide the application forms for the Illinois Adoption 20Registry and Medical Information Exchange. 21    (b) The information offered to a relinquishing person in 22accordance with this Act shall include, in addition to other 23information required under this Act, the following: 24        (1) Information that describes this Act and the rights 25    of birth parents, including an option for the parent to 26    complete and mail to the Department of Children and Family   HB2492- 10 -LRB104 08116 KTG 18162 b1    Services a form that shall ask for basic anonymous 2    background information about the relinquished child. This 3    form shall be maintained by the Department on its website. 4        (2) Information about the Illinois Adoption Registry, 5    including a toll-free number and website information. 6        (3) Information about a mother's postpartum health. 7    The information provided in writing or through electronic 8means shall be designed in coordination between the Office of 9Vital Records and the Department of Children and Family 10Services. The Failure to provide such information under this 11Section or the failure of the relinquishing person to accept 12such information shall not invalidate the relinquishment under 13this Act. 14(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-501, eff. 1-1-24; 15103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)